District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.05

Subcontractor entitled to know terms of contract.

Any subcontractor or other person employed by the contractor as aforesaid shall be entitled to demand of the owner or his authorized agent a statement of the terms under which the work contracted for is being done and the amount due or to become due to the contractor executing the same, and if the owner or his agent shall fail or refuse to give the said information, or willfully state falsely the terms of the contract or the amounts due or unpaid thereunder, the said property shall be liable to the lien of the said party demanding said information, in the same manner as if no payments had been made to the contractor before notice served on the owner as aforesaid.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1385, ch. 854, § 1243
1981 Ed., § 38-107.
1973 Ed., § 38-107.